Mississippi, session 2026, HB1235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Mississippi Heroes Support Fund Act". SECTION 2. For purposes of this act, the following terms shall have the meanings described herein: (a) "Accredited" means accreditation issued to a municipal, county or state law enforcement agency by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Accreditation Commission. (b)  "Full-time certified law enforcement officer" has the meaning provided in Section 45-6-11. (c)  "Good standing" means as of October 1 of any year in which distribution of the Mississippi Heroes Support Fund occurs, the certified law enforcement officer is not suspended or under a reprimand, has not been suspended or reprimanded within the previous twelve (12) months, or has not had his or her certification recalled or cancelled within the previous twelve (12) months. SECTION 3.  [Until January 1, 2030, the following section shall read, as follows:] (1)  (a)  The Mississippi Heroes Support Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury as a special fund.  The administration and regulation of the fund shall be vested in the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, and shall consist of: (i)  Fifty percent (50%) of all fines and assessments collected pursuant to Sections 99-19-73, 41-29-181, 99-19-307 and 63-1-43; (ii)  Donations to the fund from any source; and (iii)  Any interest accruing to the fund. (b)  By October 1 of each year, each municipal, county and state law enforcement agency shall provide the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety with a list of all full-time certified law enforcement officers who have completed at least one (1) year of full-time service with the agency, is a current employee with the agency and is otherwise in good standing with the agency.  By December 31 of each year, the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall evenly distribute all monies in the fund to any certified law enforcement officer who has completed at least one (1) year of full-time service with a law enforcement agency, is working as a full-time certified law enforcement officer at the time of distribution of the fund and is otherwise in good standing with his or her law enforcement agency. (2)  The Mississippi Heroes Support Fund is created as a special fund in the State Treasury.  Monies in the fund shall not lapse into the State General Fund at the end of the fiscal year, and all interest and other earnings on the monies in the Mississippi Heroes Support Fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (3)  All law enforcement agencies who seek to receive funds from the Mississippi Heroes Support Fund shall be accredited by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Accreditation Commission by December 31, 2029. [From and after January 1, 2030, the following section shall read, as follows:] (1)  (a)  The Mississippi Heroes Support Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury as a special fund.  The administration and regulation of the fund shall be vested in the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, and shall consist of: (i)  Fifty percent (50%) of all fines and assessments collected pursuant to Sections 99-19-73, 41-29-181, 99-19-307 and 63-1-43; (ii)  Donations to the fund from any source; and (iii)  Any interest accruing to the fund. (b)  By October 1 of each year, each municipal, county and state law enforcement agency accredited by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Accreditation Commission shall provide the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety with a list of all full-time certified law enforcement officers that have completed at least one year of full-time service with the agency, is a current employee with the agency and is otherwise in good standing with the agency.  By December 31 of each year, the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall evenly distribute all monies in the fund to any certified law enforcement officer who has completed at least one (1) year of full-time service, is working as a full-time certified law enforcement officer with an accredited law enforcement agency and is otherwise in good standing with his or her accredited law enforcement agency. (c)  The payments from the Mississippi Heroes Support Fund  shall only be awarded to officers employed by full-time law enforcement agencies accredited by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Accreditation Commission.  The monies from the Mississippi Heroes Support Fund shall only be provided to law enforcement officers who are employed by a law enforcement agency accredited by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Accreditation Commission. (2)  The Mississippi Heroes Support Fund is created as a special fund in the State Treasury.  Monies in the fund shall not lapse into the State General Fund at the end of the fiscal year, and all interest and other earnings on the monies in the Mississippi Heroes Support Fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.